Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4842.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 23. (1) A college or university or a person approved by the secretary of state may present a driver education instructor preparation program. A college, university, or person shall not offer to engage or engage in the activity of presenting a driver education instructor preparation program without the prior approval of the secretary of state. (2) A college, university, or person may apply to the secretary of state for approval to conduct a driver education instructor preparation program. A college, university, or person seeking approval shall present satisfactory evidence to the secretary of state as prescribed by the secretary of state that the college's, university's, or person's proposed program meets the requirements of this section. (3) The secretary of state shall review and approve a driver education instructor preparation program that meets the requirements of this section. The secretary of state shall give the college, university, or person requesting approval a written notice of the secretary of state's approval or denial, including the reason for any denial. (4) The secretary of state shall prepare a driver education instructor preparation program guide as a model for how to conduct a driver education instructor preparation program. The model program guide must identify the content of each course identified in subsection (7). (5) Beginning September 1, 2007, a A driver education instructor preparation program must consist of not less than 4 driver education preparation courses. (6) A college, university, or person seeking approval of a driver education instructor preparation course shall present evidence satisfactory to the secretary of state that the proposed course meets the requirements of this section. The secretary of state shall review a driver education instructor preparation course and determine whether that course meets the requirements of this act. The secretary of state shall prescribe the administration and curriculum of a driver education instructor preparation course. The secretary of state shall give the college, university, or person requesting approval written notice of the secretary of state's approval or denial, including the reason for any denial. (7) A driver education instructor preparation program must consist of not less than 4 driver education instructor preparation courses. The 4 required courses must each concentrate on only 1 of the following concepts, and all of the following concepts must be covered in the minimum 4 courses required: (a) Driver task analysis. (b) Developing classroom and program knowledge. (c) Developing vehicle operation skills. (d) Practicum. (8) A driver education instructor preparation course must consist of not less than 2 semester hours per course or the equivalent of not less than 2 semester hours per course as approved by the secretary of state. A driver education instructor preparation course must extend for not less than 3 weeks. (9) An instructor who teaches a driver education instructor preparation course shall meet the following requirements: (a) Have a master's degree in education from an accredited college or university or meet all of the following requirements: (i) Have conducted 1,500 hours or more of classroom instruction. (ii) Have conducted 500 hours or more of behind-the-wheel instruction. (iii) Have held a valid driver education instructor certificate for 3.5 years or longer. (b) Hold a valid driver education instructor certificate. issued by the secretary of state. (c) Any other requirement the secretary of state determines is necessary to determine instructor qualifications. (10) A college, university, or person approved by the secretary of state that offers a driver education instructor preparation course shall include in the course registration material information explaining that explains the driver education instructor qualifications required under this act. (11) The secretary of state shall review each driver education instructor preparation program approved under this section at least once 1 time every 3 years. (12) A driver education preparation course credit earned through a college, university, or another entity in another state may be accepted on the same basis as the equivalent credit earned through a driver education instructor preparation program conducted by a college or university or by a person approved by the secretary of state, if approved by the secretary of state. A person seeking approval of a driver education course credit earned in another state shall present satisfactory evidence to the secretary of state that the other state's course substantially meets the requirements of this state. The secretary of state shall review a driver education preparation course credit earned in another state and determine whether that course content meets the requirements of this act. The secretary of state shall give the person a written notice of the secretary of state's approval or denial, including the reason for any denial. (13) This section does not apply to an applicant for a driver education instructor certificate that is limited to the commercial vehicle driver training classification.